incubator/apertium-hsb/apertium-hsb.hsb.dix
    <pardef n="zem/ja__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jow</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jomaj</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jomaj</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jomaj</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jow</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jam</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jemi</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jach</l>
          <r>ja<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wod/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaj</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaj</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaj</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stolic/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaj</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaj</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omaj</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="stolica"><i>stolic</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="woda"><i>wod</i><par n="wod/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zemja"><i>zem</i><par n="zem/ja__n"/></e>
